Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Chapter 18

Financial Integrity Act of 1983

9-18-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Financial Integrity Act of 1983.”

Acts 1983, ch. 129, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

9-18-102. Internal controls — Management assessment of risk.

Each agency of state government and institution of higher education along with each county, municipal, and metropolitan government shall establish and maintain internal controls, which shall provide reasonable assurance that:

Obligations and costs are in compliance with applicable law;

Funds, property, and other assets are safeguarded against waste, loss, unauthorized use, or misappropriation; and

Revenues and expenditures are properly recorded and accounted for to permit the preparation of accurate and reliable financial and statistical reports and to maintain accountability over the assets.

To document compliance with the requirements set forth in subsection (a), each agency of state government and institution of higher education shall annually perform a management assessment of risk. The internal controls discussed in subsection (a) should be incorporated into this assessment. The objectives of the annual risk assessment are to provide reasonable assurance of the following:

Accountability for meeting program objectives;

Promoting operational efficiency and effectiveness;

Improving reliability of financial statements;

Strengthening compliance with laws, regulations, rules, and contracts and grant agreements; and

Reducing the risk of financial or other asset losses due to fraud, waste and abuse.

Acts 1983, ch. 129, § 1; 1998, ch. 664, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 750, § 1; 2015, ch. 112, § 1.

9-18-103. Guidelines for assessment of compliance.

The commissioner of finance and administration, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, shall establish guidelines for the assessment, by management of state agencies and higher education institutions, of the risks and systems of internal control to determine compliance with the requirements of §9-18-102. The commissioner, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury, may modify the guidelines from time to time as deemed necessary.

Acts 1983, ch. 129, § 1; 1998, ch. 664, § 3; 2008, ch. 750, § 2.

9-18-104. Report by head of executive agency.

By December 31, 2008, initially, and then by December 31 of every year thereafter, the head of each state agency and higher education institution shall, on the basis of the evaluations conducted in accordance with guidelines prescribed under § 9-18-103, prepare and transmit to the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury a report that states that:

The agency or institution acknowledges its management's responsibility for establishing, implementing and maintaining an adequate system of internal control; and

A management assessment of risk performed by the agency or institution provides or does not provide reasonable assurance of compliance with the objectives of the assessment as specified in this chapter.

In the event that the agency's or institution's assessment does not provide reasonable assurance of compliance with the objectives of the assessment as stated in this chapter, the report shall include a corrective action plan that identifies:

Any significant deficiencies or material weaknesses in the agency's or institution's system of internal control and/or lack of risk mitigating control activity; and

The plans and the schedule for correcting the weaknesses.

Acts 1983, ch. 129, § 1; 1998, ch. 664, §§ 4-6; 2008, ch. 750, § 3; 2009, ch. 99, § 1.